Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-12,164
Rules and regulations.

The department may
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Business Innovation
Act, including application procedures.

Laws 2011, LB387, § 13;

Laws 2013, LB78, § 17.